test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-vuen_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - vueʹn a-stem anoppi: # Noun - full paradigm
     vueʹn+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: vueʹn
     vueʹn+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: vuânnam
     vueʹn+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: vuânnam
     vueʹn+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: vuânnma
     vueʹn+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: vuânnmest
     vueʹn+N+Sg+Com+Indef: vuânnmin
     vueʹn+N+Ess+Indef: [vueʹnen, vuânnmen]
     vueʹn+N+Par+Indef: [vueʹned, vuânnmed]
     vueʹn+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [vuânnamtaa, vuânnamtää]
     vueʹn+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: vuânnam
     vueʹn+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: vuânnmi
     vueʹn+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: vuânnmid
     vueʹn+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: vuânnmid
     vueʹn+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: vuânnmin
     vueʹn+N+Pl+Com+Indef: vuânnmivuiʹm
     vueʹn+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [vuânnmitaa, vuânnmitää]
